North Dakota statutes. TITLE 15.1 Elementary and Secondary Education
CHAPTER 15.1-27 State Aid
15.1-27-27.1.
School district transportation of special education students — Payments.

Subject to legislative appropriation, the superintendent of public instruction shall pay each school district transporting students enrolled in special education programs approved by the superintendent of public instruction:

The amount provided in section 15.1-27-26.1 for vehicles that have a capacity of fewer than ten students if the school district is transporting fewer than ten students per vehicle;

The amount provided in section 15.1-27-26.1 for vehicles that have a capacity of ten or more students if the school district is transporting ten or more students per vehicle; and

The additional amount provided in section 15.1-27-26.1, per one-way trip, for each student transported.

Subject to legislative appropriation, a school district entitled to payments under this section is entitled to receive transportation aid for all miles [kilometers] traveled and for all students transported, regardless of whether the students transported live within the incorporated limits of the city in which the students’ school is located.

Subject to legislative appropriation, the superintendent of public instruction shall reimburse school districts fifty cents per day per mile [1.61 kilometers] if:

The student being transported has a disability, as defined in chapter 15.1-32;

The student has an individualized education plan that requires the student attend a public or nonpublic school located outside the student’s school district of residence;

The student is transported by an adult family member in family provided transportation; and

The reimbursement does not exceed two round trips per day between the home of the student and the school.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the superintendent of public instruction, upon request from the school district, shall make the payments due to a school district under this section directly to a multidistrict special education unit.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 162, § 2, effective August 1, 2021.

15.1-27-28.
School district transportation of career and technical education students — Payments. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2003, Sp., ch. 667, § 41.

15.1-27-28.1.
School district transportation of career and technical education students — Payments.

Subject to legislative appropriation, the superintendent of public instruction shall pay each school district transporting students to and from schools in other school districts, to and from area career and technology centers, and to and from schools within the district for career and technical education courses offered through cooperative arrangements approved by the state board for career and technical education:

The amount provided in section 15.1-27-26.1 for vehicles that have a capacity of fewer than ten students if the school district is transporting fewer than ten students per vehicle;

The amount provided in section 15.1-27-26.1 for vehicles that have a capacity of ten or more students if the school district is transporting ten or more students per vehicle; and

The additional amount provided in section 15.1-27-26.1, per one-way trip, for each student transported.

Subject to legislative appropriation, a school district entitled to payments under this section is entitled to receive transportation aid for all miles [kilometers] traveled and for all students transported, regardless of whether the students transported live within the incorporated limits of the city in which the students’ school is located.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the superintendent of public instruction, upon request from the school district, shall make the payments due to a school district under this section directly to an area career and technology center.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 162, § 3, effective August 1, 2021.

15.1-27-29.
Transportation payments — Certification of information. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2003, Sp., ch. 667, § 41.

15.1-27-30.
School district closure — Distribution of transportation payments. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2003, Sp., ch. 667, § 41.

15.1-27-30.1.
School district closure — Distribution of transportation payments.

If a school district ceases to exist, the superintendent of public instruction shall calculate the amount of transportation payments to which the former school district would have been entitled for providing transportation services during the school district’s final year of operation and shall pay a percentage of the amount certified to each school district in the state which enrolls students who attended the former school district during the prior school year. Each school district eligible for payment under this section is entitled to receive the percentage of the total amount certified which is the same as the percentage of the number of the district’s students who attended the former school district during the prior school year bears to the total number of students who attended the former school district during the prior school year.

Subject to legislative appropriation, the superintendent of public instruction shall pay the amount to which a school district is entitled under this section in the manner and at the time provided for other state payments in section 15.1-27-01.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 162, § 4, effective August 1, 2021.

15.1-27-31.
State transportation payments to school districts. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2003, Sp., ch. 667, § 41.

Note.

Section 41 of chapter 667, S.L. 2003, Sp. repealed this section effective July 1, 2003, pursuant to section 42 of chapter 667, S.L. 2003, Sp.

15.1-27-31.1.
State transportation payments to school districts.

Subject to legislative appropriation, the superintendent of public instruction shall determine the total amount of payments to be made to the school districts for the transportation of students and shall pay the amount certified to each school district. Payments must be made in the same manner and at the time provided for other state payments in section 15.1-27-01. The superintendent of public instruction may not distribute more than one-half of the amount appropriated for transportation grants for any biennium in the first year of the biennium. If total transportation reimbursement claims exceed the amount appropriated by the legislative assembly, the superintendent of public instruction shall reduce transportation reimbursements on a prorated basis for all school districts requesting reimbursements.

A school district may not receive more than ninety percent of the actual costs incurred for the transportation of students.

For purposes of this section, actual costs include the transportation operating expenditures reported to the superintendent of public instruction for the most recent year plus the eight-year average cost of transportation equipment determined by the superintendent of public instruction. Any district having contracted for transportation services may determine the actual costs for the first year the district provides its own transportation services by using the statewide average cost of transportation during the first year.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 162, § 5, effective August 1, 2021.

15.1-27-32.
School district closure — Distribution of per student special education payments. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 163, § 58.

15.1-27-33.
Nonoperating school districts — Education of students — State payments. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2005, ch. 172, § 1.

15.1-27-34.
Transfer of funds prohibited — Youth correctional center.

The superintendent of public instruction may not transfer any portion of the funds appropriated for state aid payments to the youth correctional center to support the provision of educational services by the youth correctional center.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 181, § 11; 2003 Sp., ch. 667, § 17.

15.1-27-35.
Average daily membership — Calculation.

Average daily membership is calculated at the conclusion of the school year by adding the total number of hours that each student in a given grade, school, or school district is in attendance at the school’s physical plant during a school calendar and the total number of hours that each student in a given grade, school, or school district is absent during a school calendar, and then dividing the sum by:

Nine hundred sixty-two and one-half hours for elementary school students; or

One thousand fifty hours for middle and high school students.

For purposes of calculating average daily membership:

A student enrolled full time in any grade from one through twelve may not exceed an average daily membership of 1.00. The membership may be prorated for a student who is enrolled less than full time.

A student enrolled full time in an approved regular education kindergarten program may not exceed an average daily membership of 1.00. The membership may be prorated for a student who is enrolled less than full time.

A student enrolled full time, as defined by the superintendent of public instruction, in an approved early childhood special education program may not exceed an average daily membership of 1.00. The membership may be prorated for a student who is enrolled less than full time.

A student enrolled full time in virtual instruction is calculated at an average daily membership of 1.00. The membership may be prorated for a student who is enrolled less than full time.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 181, § 11; 2005, ch. 167, § 17; 2007, ch. 163, § 23; 2009, ch. 175, § 38; 2013, ch. 13, § 37; 2019, ch. 149, § 14, effective July 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 141, § 12, effective August 1, 2021.

15.1-27-35.1.
Average daily membership — Reduction in grade levels.

If a school district offers fewer grade levels than the district offered the previous school year, the superintendent of public instruction shall determine the district’s average daily membership using only those grade levels that the district offers during the current school year.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 163, § 24.

15.1-27-35.2.
Average daily membership — Dissolved school districts.

For purposes of determining state aid, the superintendent of public instruction shall amend the average daily membership of any school district that enrolls students who attended a dissolved school district during the school year prior to the dissolution.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 163, § 25.

15.1-27-35.3.
Payments to school districts — Unobligated general fund balance.

Except as provided in subdivision b, beginning July 1, 2023, the superintendent of public instruction shall determine the amount of payments due to a school district and shall subtract from that the amount by which the unobligated general fund balance of the district on the preceding June thirtieth is in excess of thirty-five percent of its actual expenditures, plus fifty thousand dollars.

The superintendent of public instruction shall determine the amount of payments due to a school district and shall subtract from that the amount by which the unobligated general fund balance of the district on the preceding June thirtieth is in excess of thirty-five percent of its actual expenditures, plus one hundred thousand dollars if the school district is in a cooperative agreement with another school district to share academic resources, and the school districts are considering reorganization under chapter 15.1-12. An eligible school district may receive payments under this provision for a maximum of two years.

For purposes of this section, a district’s unobligated general fund balance includes all moneys in the district’s miscellaneous fund, as established under section 57-15-14.2, but does not include federal impact aid funding.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 163, § 26; 2009, ch. 175, § 39; 2011, ch. 147, § 28; 2013, ch. 13, § 38; 2015, ch. 137, § 14, effective July 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 148, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 144, § 2, effective April 16, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 14 of chapter 137, S.L. 2015 became effective July 1, 2015.

Note.

The 2015 amendment to this section by
section 14, of chapter 137, S.L. 2015, was to remove the expiration date of the section.

15.1-27-36.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 163, § 58.

15.1-27-37.
Compensation of teachers — Claim for reimbursement — Rules. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 163, § 58.

15.1-27-38.
Compensation of teachers — Distribution of reimbursements. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 163, § 58.

15.1-27-39.
Annual salary — Minimum amount.

Beginning with the 2014-15 school year, the board of each school district shall provide to each full-time teacher, under contract for a period of nine months, a minimum salary level for the contract period equal to at least twenty-seven thousand five hundred dollars.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 173, § 12; 2003 Sp., ch. 667, § 20; 2005, ch. 167, § 19; 2013, ch. 13, § 39.

15.1-27-40.
Approved joint powers agreement — Report of expenses. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 162, § 18.

15.1-27-41.
North Dakota commission on education improvement — Membership — Duties — Report to legislative council — Reimbursement for expenses. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 175, § 65.

15.1-27-42.
Military installation school districts — Eligibility for state aid and equity payments. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 163, § 53; 2013, ch. 13, § 62; repealed by 2015, ch. 137, § 38., effective July 1, 2015.

15.1-27-43.
Reorganized district — Continuation of equity payment. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 175, § 35; 2013, ch. 13, § 62; repealed by 2015, ch. 137, § 38., effective July 1, 2015.

15.1-27-44.
Dissolved district — Continuation of equity payment. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 175, § 36; 2013, ch. 13, § 62; repealed by 2015, ch. 137, § 38, effective July 1, 2015.

15.1-27-45.
Property tax relief fund. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 13, § 40; repealed by 2015, ch. 467, § 7, effective April 27, 2015.

15.1-27-46.
Uses of the foundation aid stabilization fund. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2015, ch. 153, § 2; repealed by 2017, ch. 368, § 9, effective April 10, 2017.